Missouri, session 2026, HB2339.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 455.010 and 455.032, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 455.010 and 455.032, to read as follows:
455.010. As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Abuse", includes but is not limited to the occurrence of any of the following acts,
attempts or threats against a person who may be protected pursuant to this chapter, except
abuse shall not include abuse inflicted on a child by accidental means by an adult household
member or discipline of a child, including spanking, in a reasonable manner:
(a) "Abusing a pet", purposely or knowingly causing, attempting to cause, or
threatening to cause physical injury to a pet with the intent to control, punish, intimidate, or
distress the petitioner;
(b) "Assault", purposely or knowingly placing or attempting to place another in fear
of physical harm;
(c) "Battery", purposely or knowingly causing physical harm to another with or
without a deadly weapon;
(d) "Coercion", compelling another by force or threat of force to engage in conduct
from which the latter has a right to abstain or to abstain from conduct in which the person has
a right to engage;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2339 2
(e) "Harassment", engaging in a purposeful or knowing course of conduct involving
more than one incident that alarms or causes distress to an adult or child and serves no
legitimate purpose. The course of conduct must be such as would cause a reasonable adult or
child to suffer substantial emotional distress and must actually cause substantial emotional
distress to the petitioner or child. Such conduct might include, but is not limited to:
a. Following another about in a public place or places;
b. Peering in the window or lingering outside the residence of another; but does not
include constitutionally protected activity;
(f) "Sexual assault", causing or attempting to cause another to engage involuntarily in
any sexual act by force, threat of force, duress, or without that person's consent;
(g) "Unlawful imprisonment", holding, confining, detaining or abducting another
person against that person's will;
(2) "Adult", any person seventeen years of age or older or otherwise emancipated;
(3) "Child", any person under seventeen years of age unless otherwise emancipated;
(4) "Coercive control", purposely or unreasonably interfering with a person's
free will and personal liberty, which may include, but is not limited to, unreasonably
engaging in the following:
(a) Isolating the person from friends, relatives, or other sources of support;
(b) Depriving the person of basic necessities;
(c) Controlling, regulating, or monitoring the person's movements,
communications, daily behavior, finances, economic resources, or access to services; or
(d) Compelling the person by force, threat of force, or intimidation, including
threats based on actual or suspected immigration status, to engage in conduct from
which the person has a right to abstain or to abstain from conduct in which the person
has a right to engage;
(5) "Court", the circuit or associate circuit judge or a family court commissioner;
(6) "Disturbing the peace of the petitioner" or "disturbing the peace of the
victim", conduct that, based on the totality of the circumstances, destroys the mental or
emotional calm of the petitioner or the victim. Such conduct may be committed directly
or indirectly, including through the use of a third party, and by any method or through
any means including, but not limited to, telephone, online accounts, text messages,
internet-connected devices, or other electronic technologies. Such conduct may also
include, but is not limited to, coercive control, as defined in this section;
[(5)] (7) "Domestic violence", abuse or stalking committed by a family or household
member, as such terms are defined in this section;
[(6)] (8) "Ex parte order of protection", an order of protection issued by the court
before the respondent has received notice of the petition or an opportunity to be heard on it;

HB 2339 3
[(7)] (9) "Family" or "household member", spouses, former spouses, any person
related by blood or marriage, persons who are presently residing together or have resided
together in the past, any person who is or has been in a continuing social relationship of a
romantic or intimate nature with the victim, and anyone who has a child in common
regardless of whether they have been married or have resided together at any time;
[(8)] (10) "Full order of protection", an order of protection issued after a hearing on
the record where the respondent has received notice of the proceedings and has had an
opportunity to be heard;
[(9)] (11) "Order of protection", either an ex parte order of protection or a full order of
protection;
[(10)] (12) "Pending", exists or for which a hearing date has been set;
[(11)] (13) "Pet", a living creature maintained by a household member for
companionship and not for commercial purposes;
[(12)] (14) "Petitioner", a family or household member who has been a victim of
domestic violence, or any person who has been the victim of stalking or sexual assault, or a
person filing on behalf of a child pursuant to section 455.503 who has filed a verified petition
pursuant to the provisions of section 455.020 or section 455.505;
[(13)] (15) "Respondent", the family or household member alleged to have committed
an act of domestic violence, or person alleged to have committed an act of stalking or sexual
assault, against whom a verified petition has been filed or a person served on behalf of a child
pursuant to section 455.503;
[(14)] (16) "Sexual assault", as defined under subdivision (1) of this section;
[(15)] (17) "Stalking", is when any person purposely engages in an unwanted course
of conduct that causes alarm to another person, or a person who resides together in the same
household with the person seeking the order of protection when it is reasonable in that
person's situation to have been alarmed by the conduct. As used in this subdivision:
(a) "Alarm", to cause fear of danger of physical harm; and
(b) "Course of conduct", two or more acts that serve no legitimate purpose including,
but not limited to, acts in which the stalker directly, indirectly, or through a third party
follows, monitors, observes, surveils, threatens, or communicates to a person by any action,
method, or device.
455.032. In addition to any other jurisdictional grounds provided by law, a court shall
have jurisdiction to enter an order of protection restraining or enjoining the respondent from
committing or threatening to commit domestic violence, stalking, sexual assault, molesting or
disturbing the peace of the petitioner, or abusing a pet, pursuant to sections 455.010 to
455.085, if the petitioner is present, whether permanently or on a temporary basis within the
state of Missouri and if the respondent's actions constituting domestic violence have occurred,

HB 2339 4
have been attempted or have been or are threatened within the state of Missouri. For purposes
of this section, if the petitioner has been the subject of domestic violence within or outside of
the state of Missouri, such evidence shall be admissible to demonstrate the need for protection
in Missouri.
✔